Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.355, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Houses left overnight. A fish house, dark house, or shelter left on the ice overnight must be marked with reflective material on each side of the structure. The reflective material must measure a total area of no less than deleted text begin twodeleted text end new text begin 144new text end square inches new text begin and be visible new text end on each side of the structure.